Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1906
Foreclosure proceedings; unknown owners; real property as defendant.

The plaintiff may also, if desired, include as or make the real property described in the complaint a defendant and, if the owners of any such real property are unknown and cannot be found, may proceed against the real property itself, but in such case the service shall be as in the case of an unknown defendant.

Laws 1943, c. 176, § 6, p. 616;

R.S.1943, § 77-1906;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 169;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 142;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 84.

For proceedings against unknown defendants, see section 25-321.

For provisions for mailing copy of notice, see sections 25-520.01 to 25-520.03.